Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Multimodal Systems (a) Aeronautics (1) Airport Development and Assistance 69,598,000 18,598,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 36,000,000 -0- Airports 33,598,000 18,598,000 The appropriation from the state airports fund must be spent according to Minnesota Statutes, section 360.305, subdivision 4. $36,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for matches to federal aid and state investments related to airport infrastructure projects. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the state airports fund for system maintenance of critical airport safety systems, equipment, and essential airfield technology. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 6, the appropriation from the state airports fund is available for five years after the year of the appropriation. If the appropriation for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available for it. If the commissioner of transportation determines that a balance remains in the state airports fund following the appropriations made in this article and that the appropriations made are insufficient for advancing airport development and assistance projects, an amount necessary to advance the projects, not to exceed the balance in the state airports fund, is appropriated in each year to the commissioner and must be spent according to Minnesota Statutes, section 360.305, subdivision 4. Within two weeks of a determination under this contingent appropriation, the commissioner of transportation must notify the commissioner of management and budget and the chairs, ranking minority members, and staff of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance concerning the funds appropriated. Funds appropriated under this contingent appropriation do not adjust the base for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. (2) Aviation Support Services 15,397,000 8,431,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 8,707,000 1,741,000 Airports 6,690,000 6,690,000 $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund to purchase two utility aircraft for the Department of Transportation. (3) Civil Air Patrol 80,000 80,000 This appropriation is from the state airports fund for the Civil Air Patrol. (b) Transit and Active Transportation 58,478,000 18,374,000 This appropriation is from the general fund. $200,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for a grant to the city of Rochester to implement demand response transit service using electric transit vehicles. The money is available for mobile software application development; vehicles and equipment, including accessible vehicles; associated charging infrastructure; and capital and operating costs. $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for matches to federal aid and state investments related to transit and active transportation projects. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (c) Safe Routes to School 15,297,000 10,500,000 This appropriation is from the general fund for the safe routes to school program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.40. If the appropriation for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available for it. The appropriations in each year are available until June 30, 2027. The base for this appropriation is $1,500,000 in each of fiscal years 2026 and 2027. (d) Passenger Rail 197,521,000 4,226,000 This appropriation is from the general fund for passenger rail activities under Minnesota Statutes, sections 174.632 to 174.636. $194,700,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for capital improvements and betterments for the Minneapolis-Duluth Northern Lights Express intercity passenger rail project, including preliminary engineering, design, engineering, environmental analysis and mitigation, acquisition of land and right-of-way, equipment and rolling stock, and construction. From this appropriation, the amount necessary is for: (1) Coon Rapids station improvements to establish a joint station that provides for Amtrak train service on the Empire Builder line between Chicago and Seattle; and (2) acquisition of equipment and rolling stock for purposes of participation in the Midwest fleet pool to provide for service on Northern Lights Express and expanded Amtrak train service between Minneapolis and St. Paul and Chicago. The commissioner of transportation must not approve additional stops or stations beyond those included in the Federal Railroad Administration's January 2018 Finding of No Significant Impact and Section 4(f) Determination if the commissioner determines that the resulting speed reduction would negatively impact total ridership. This appropriation is onetime and is available new text begin for this purpose new text end until June 30, 2028.new text begin If federal funds for final design and construction of the project are not granted by June 30, 2028, any remaining amount of this appropriation is for the corridors of commerce program under Minnesota Statutes, section 161.088, and is available until June 30, 2032.new text end $1,833,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $3,238,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for a match to federal aid for capital and operating costs for expanded Amtrak train service between Minneapolis and St. Paul and Chicago. The base from the general fund is $5,742,000 in each of fiscal years 2026 and 2027. (e) Freight 14,650,000 9,066,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 8,283,000 2,400,000 Trunk Highway 6,367,000 6,666,000 $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for matching federal aid grants for improvements, engineering, and administrative costs for the Stone Arch Bridge in Minneapolis. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. $1,000,000 in each year is from the general fund for staff, operating costs, and maintenance related to weight and safety enforcement systems. $974,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for procurement costs of a statewide freight network optimization tool under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 4, section 133. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025.